src/phonology/gle-phon.nouns.xfscript
!***************************************************************************
!URÚ - ECLIPSIS
!***************************************************************************
.o.
[
 b -> %^FU m b ,	! consonants
 B -> %^FU m B ,	! consonants
 c -> %^FU g c ,
 C -> %^FU g C ,
 d -> %^FU n d ,
 D -> %^FU n D ,
 f -> %^FU b h f ,
 F -> %^FU b h F ,
 g -> %^FU n g ,
 G -> %^FU n G ,
 p -> %^FU b p ,
 P -> %^FU b P ,
 T -> %^FU d T ,
 t -> %^FU d t || .#. _ ?+ [[%^G]| [[%^M | %^F] %^C]|[%^Verb]|[%^Adj]|[%^IM]] ?* %^Urú		! Gen Pl & comp prep.
]
.o. 
[..] -> %^FU n %-  || .#. (%^X) _  VowelAll ?* [[%^G]| [[%^M | %^F] %^C]|[%^Verb]|[%^IM]] ?* %^Urú		! Gen Pl only

.o.
[%^Urú -> []]


!***************************************************************************
! VOWEL PREFIXING t-, h, ts
!***************************************************************************
.o.
! t- before Vowel (lowercase) : Masc Com Sg
[..] -> %^FV t %- || .#. (%^X) _ VowelLC ?* %^M %^C ?* %^tv			
.o.
! t before Vowel (uppercase) : Masc Com Sg
[..] -> %^FV t || .#. (%^X) _ VowelUC ?* %^M %^C ?* %^tv			
.o.
[%^tv -> []]

.o.

! h before Vowel [ Fem Gen Sg | Com Pl]
! ALSO le hÁine, go hiontach
[..] -> %^FV h   || .#. (%^X) _ VowelAll ?* [[%^F %^G] | [%^C]|[%^Verb]|%^IM] ?* %^hv		
!.o.
! this inserts hPref on lower not upper side
![0 <- %+hPref || .#. %^FV _ ]
.o.
[%^hv -> []]

.o.
! t before s [ Fem Com Sg | Masc Gen]
 s -> %^FU t s || .#. _  (%^FH) [VowelAll|l|n|r|h] ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]] ?* %^ts

.o.
 S -> %^FU t S || .#. _  (%^FH) [VowelAll|l|n|r|h] ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]] ?* %^ts
.o.
 
%^FH h -> [] || .#. %^FU t [s|S] _ 
!!!h -> [] || .#. %^FU t [s|S] %^FH  _ 

.o. 

%^ts -> []


!***************************************************************************
! POSSESSIVE PREFIX 
!***************************************************************************
.o.

! the following two are now included in determiners with mo and do

![..] -> m '  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss 		! m'athair - my father; m'aithreacha
!,,
![..] -> d '  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss		! d'athair - your father
!,,

! the following are performed in parallel as we want all forms

[..] -> %^FV h  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss			! a hathair - her father
,,
[..] -> %^FV n %-  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss 		! n-athair - our/your/their
.o.
%^Poss -> []

.o.
%^IM -> []	! initial mutations caused by compound prepp, possessives etc.

;
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! (c) 2001
!
! 2004 included %^FC and %^FY in Cons
!****************************************************************************
! ^Caol : Caolú (Attenuation) Slenderisation of broad words
!
! should be applied after Initial Mutation (after ^Urú, ^hv etc tags are removed)
!
!***************************************************************************

define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|%^FC|%^FY;
define Vowel a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|%^AE|%^AO|%^UA;

! marcach, clúdach, misneach, dúch
! polysyllabic stems only, e.g. not beach, laoch
read regex c h -> %^FC g h || Vowel+ Cons+ %^X (e) a _ %^Caol 

.o.
! beithíoch -> beithígh (gs)		13/04/08
! also áinsíoch, gaiscíoch etc.
! polysyllabic stems only

c h -> %^FC g h || Vowel+ Cons+ %^X í o _ %^Caol 

.o.
! exception dúch -> dúigh
c h -> %^FC g h || d ú _ %^Caol 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! beach, sceach, nead, neamh (+e => all fem )
! also cuach, cruach, 
! but not misneach as ch has become gh (see top)
.o.
!!!!a -> %^FS i || %^X [e|u] _ [[c h] | d| m ] %^Caol e	
a -> %^FS i || %^X [e|u] _ [[c (h)] 	!cuach - cuiche, 
                           |[b (h)]	!dealbh - deilbhe
                           |[d (h)]	!nead - neide, fleadh - fleidhe
                           |[l b h]	!dealbh - deilbhe
                           |[n g]	!reang - reinge
                           |[r c]	!searc - seirce, leac - leice
                           |[r g]	!fearg - feirge
                           |[t h]	!leath - leithe
                           |[s]		!greas - greise
                           |[m (h)]	!neamh - neimhe (added '(h)') - CW 09/08
                           ] %^Caol e
						
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------

! fear, inneall, (all masc.?)
! leanbh???,geall , 
! airgead								
! beag -> bige adj
! not earc
.o.	
e a -> %^FS i || Cons+ %^X _ Cons+ %^Caol

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! éan, séipéal 
.o.
a -> %^FS i || %^X é _ Cons+ %^Caol

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! seol
! naomh, craobh, gaol, saol, fraoch
! ball, leabhar
! bruscar, bac but not balla
! bád, sleán, Seán 
! cnoc, post, tonn, bocht, 
! fód, glór
! punt, cúr, casúr, bruas
! oil(e)án, cin(e)ál, s(e)án
.o.
 [..] -> %^FS i || %^X (e) [%^AO|a|á|o|ó|u|ú|%^UA] _ Cons+ %^Caol 	

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! náis(i)ún, proifisiúin
.o.
 [..] -> %^FS i || %^X (i) ú _ Cons+ %^Caol 	
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! íol, bíol, síol, buíon, suíomh
! fionn 
! eachaíos - eachaís, soilíos - soilís
.o.
 o -> [%^FS ] || %^X (a|u) [i|í] _ Cons+ %^Caol 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! fliuch - fliche
.o.
 u -> [%^FS ] || %^X  [i|í] _ Cons+ %^Caol 
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! grian->gréine, pian->péine, 
! sliabh->sléibhte, 
! (h)iall->(h)éille
! liach - léiche
! cliabh needs fixing
.o.
 i a -> %^FS é i || %^X (h) _ Cons+ %^Caol (t) e
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! rian->riain
.o.
 [..] -> %^FS i || %^X i a _ Cons+ %^Caol .#.

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! scian->sceana
.o.
i a -> %^FS e a || %^X _ Cons+ %^Caol a 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 %^Caol -> []
;

! Noun & Adjective (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
!
! (c) January 2001
!
! (1) Coimriú : Syncopation of Last Unstressed Syllable (^Coim)
!		before an ending is added
!***************************************************************************!
! SYNCOPATION
!
! Vowel(s) in last syllable is/are dropped
! saghas-saghs(anna)
! (a|e) is required for i->[] in cabh(a)ir 
! abhh(a)inn nneds fixing
! daing(e)an, ís(e)al
! but not cath^AOir 
! domhn (domhain)
! folmh (folamh) 
! bóthr(syncopated bóthar)
! ramh^Xr (ramhar)
! uasl (uasal) (^UA=ua diph.)
! máthr (máthair)
! dors (doras)
!***************************************************************************!

define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z;
define Nountag  %^F|%^M|%^C|%^G|%^V;
! cloigeann - cloigne, craiceann - craicne
read regex [e a n n] -> [%^FY n e] || Cons  _ [Nountag+ |%^Adj] %^Coim
.o.
! drioball - drible, fuigheall - fuighle
[e a l l] -> [%^FY l e],
[a l l]   -> [%^FY l e] || Cons  _ [Nountag+ |%^Adj] %^Coim

.o.
! abhaill - abhla, abhlacha
[a i l l]   -> [%^FY l a] || Cons  _ [Nountag+ |%^Adj] %^Coim

.o.
[a|e|i|o|u] -> [%^FY] || Cons  (a|e) _  ?^<3  [Nountag+ |%^Adj] %^Coim
.o.
 %^Coim -> []
;
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules - Part E
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
!
! 2001
!
! Vowel Harmony of Broad and Slender Vowels: 
!	Broad (back) - labio-velarised; sounds like w-glide after vowel
!	Slender (forward) - palatalised; sounds like y-glide after vowel
!	Ref: Fiosfeasa
!
! Endings (which are appended to the root) must be broad or slender to agree with root 
!
! NB: this must be tested after ^Coim, ^Caol or ^Lea tags have been applied
!
! Examples 
! (1) (e)acha	: neadacha (nests), stoirmeacha (storms)
! (2) (e)anna	: carranna (cars),  áiteanna (places)
!
!  The broad ending "acha" or "anna" will be applied as standard. If the root
!  is now found to be slender an "e" will be inserted
!
! 2004 included %^FC %^FY %^FB and %^FS in Cons
!***************************************************************************!
define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|%^FC|%^FY|%^FS|%^FB;
read regex %^X -> []			! no longer required and it would 
					! get in the way of the next rule

.o.
! ^VH marker is replaced by "e" if final syllable is slender
[ %^VH -> e || [i|í] Cons* _ ]		! check if the last vowel before the %^VH
					! is slender (ie an "i" or "í" )
.o.

[ a -> [] || a %^VH _ ]		! remove extre "a" in  Havana^VHach
.o.
 %^VH -> [] 

.o.

[..] -> e || [e|é|i|í|%^AE] Cons* s _ %^Emph

.o.

[..] -> a || [a|á|o|ó|u|ú|%^UA|%^IA|%^AO] Cons* s _ %^Emph

.o.

[..] -> %- ||  s _ s (a|e) %^Emph

.o.

%^Emph -> []
;

! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
!
! 2001
! 2004 include ^FY flag with consonants 
!***************************************************************************!
! (1) Insert "^X" before the final vowel group of every word in the lexicon
!***************************************************************************!
! 
define Vowel a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|%^AO|%^IA|%^AE|%^UA;
define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|%^FY;
define Nountag  %^F|%^M|%^C|%^G|%^V;


! @-> = match longest string of vowels
! %^X... = insert ^X before the searched for text

read regex Vowel+ @-> %^X... || _ Cons* [Nountag|%^Adj]

!***************************************************************************!
! (2) These markers are no longer required
!***************************************************************************!

.o.
 %^M -> []
.o.
 %^F -> []
.o.
 %^C -> []
.o.
 %^G -> []
.o.
 %^V -> []
.o.
 %^Adj -> []
;
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules - Part C0
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
!
! 2001
!
! (1) Remove the ^Caol (slenderise) tag if the word is already slender
!     i.e. if the last vowel is "i" or "í"
! (2) Remove the ^Lea (broaden) tag if the word is already broad
!     i.e. if the last vowel is NOT "i" or "í"
! (3) NB this must happen after Syncopation has taken place
!
! 2004 included %^FC and %^FY in Cons 
!***************************************************************************!

define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|%^FC|%FY;
read regex [ %^Caol -> [] || [i|í] Cons* _ 	! search to check if 
				! the last vowel is an "i" or "í" 
]
.o.
[									
 %^Lea -> [] || [a|o|u|á|ó|ú|%^UA|%^AO|%^AE|%^IA] Cons* _ 	
				! check that the last vowel is NOT an "i" or "í" 
				! U=ua O=ao E=ae (I=ia included though not in use)
]
;

compose net
